Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Subpart 1 Filing Office; Contents and Effectiveness of Financing Statement

11-9-501.
Filing office.

Filing offices.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest or agricultural lien, the office in which to file a financing statement to perfect the security interest or agricultural lien is:

The office designated for the filing or recording of a record of a mortgage on the related real property, if:

The collateral is as-extracted collateral, growing crops, or timber to be cut; or

The financing statement is filed as a fixture filing and the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures; or

The office of the clerk of the superior court of any county of this state, in all other cases, including a case in which the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures and the financing statement is not filed as a fixture filing.

Filing office for transmitting utilities.The office in which to file a financing statement to perfect a security interest in collateral, including fixtures, of a transmitting utility is the office of the clerk of the superior court of any county of this state. The financing statement also constitutes a fixture filing as to the collateral indicated in the financing statement which is or is to become fixtures.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-501, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 995, § 6.

The 2002 amendment,

effective July 1, 2002, inserted “growing” in the middle of subparagraph (a)(1)(A).

11-9-502.
Contents of financing statement; record of mortgage as fixture filing or financing statement; time of filing financing statement.

Sufficiency of financing statement.Subject to subsection (b) of this Code section, a financing statement is sufficient only if it:

Provides the name of the debtor;

Provides the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party;

Indicates the collateral covered by the financing statement; and

Where both (A) the collateral described consists only of consumer goods as defined in paragraph (24) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-102 and (B) the secured obligation is originally $5,000.00 or less, gives the maturity date of the secured obligation or specifies that such obligation is not subject to a maturity date.

Real property related financing statements.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-501, to be sufficient, a financing statement that covers as-extracted collateral, growing crops, or timber to be cut, or which is filed as a fixture filing and covers goods that are or are to become fixtures, must satisfy subsection (a) of this Code section and also:

Indicate that it covers this type of collateral;

Indicate that it is to be filed for record in the real property records;

Provide a description of the real property to which the collateral is related sufficient to give constructive notice of a mortgage under the law of this state if the description were contained in a record of the mortgage of the real property; and

If the debtor does not have an interest of record in the real property, provide the name of a record owner.

Record of mortgage as fixture filing or financing statement.A record of a mortgage filed prior to January 1, 1995, which was effective as a fixture filing when recorded remains effective as a fixture filing, and a record of a mortgage recorded on or after July 1, 2013, is effective, from the date of recording, as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut only if:

The record indicates the goods or accounts that it covers;

The goods are or are to become fixtures related to the real property described in the record or the collateral is related to the real property described in the record and is as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut;

The record satisfies the requirements for a financing statement in this Code section, but:

The record need not indicate that it is to be filed in the real property records; and

The record sufficiently provides the name of a debtor who is an individual if it provides the individual name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the debtor, even if the debtor is an individual to whom paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-503 applies; and

The record is duly recorded.

Filing before security agreement or attachment.A financing statement may be filed before a security agreement is made or a security interest otherwise attaches.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-502, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 995, § 7; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 10/SB 185.

The 2002 amendment,

effective July 1, 2002, inserted “growing” near the middle of the introductory language of subsection (b).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “Real estate mortgages as fixture filings. A real estate mortgage may not be filed as a fixture filing, but one filed prior to January 1, 1995, which was effective as a fixture filing when filed, remains effective as a fixture filing until the mortgage is released or satisfied of record or its effectiveness otherwise terminates as to the real estate.”

11-9-503.
Name of debtor and secured party.

Sufficiency of debtor’s name.A financing statement sufficiently provides the name of the debtor:

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, if the debtor is a registered organization or the collateral is held in a trust that is a registered organization, only if the financing statement provides the name that is stated to be the registered organization’s name on the public organic record most recently filed with or issued or enacted by the registered organization’s jurisdiction of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the registered organization’s name;

Subject to subsection (f) of this Code section, if the collateral is being administered by the personal representative of a decedent, only if the financing statement provides, as the name of the debtor, the name of the decedent and, in a separate part of the financing statement, indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative;

If the collateral is held in a trust that is not a registered organization, only if the financing statement:

Provides, as the name of the debtor:

If the organic record of the trust specifies a name for the trust, the name specified; or

If the organic record of the trust does not specify a name for the trust, the name of the settlor or testator; and

In a separate part of the financing statement:

If the name is provided in accordance with division (3)(A)(i) of this subsection, indicates that the collateral is held in a trust; or

If the name is provided in accordance with division (3)(A)(ii) of this subsection, provides additional information sufficient to distinguish the trust from other trusts having one or more of the same settlors or the same testator and indicates that the collateral is held in a trust, unless the additional information so indicates;

Subject to subsection (g) of this Code section, if the debtor is an individual to whom this state has issued a driver’s license that has not expired, only if the financing statement provides the name of the individual which is indicated on the driver’s license;

If the debtor is an individual to whom paragraph (4) of this subsection does not apply, only if the financing statement provides the individual name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the debtor; and

In other cases:

If the debtor has a name, only if the financing statement provides the organizational name of the debtor; and

If the debtor does not have a name, only if it provides the names of the partners, members, associates, or other persons comprising the debtor, in a manner that each name provided would be sufficient if the person named were the debtor.

Additional debtor related information.A financing statement that provides the name of the debtor in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section is not rendered ineffective by the absence of:

A trade name or other name of the debtor; or

Unless required under subparagraph (a)(6)(B) of this Code section, names of partners, members, associates, or other persons comprising the debtor.

Debtor’s trade name insufficient.A financing statement that provides only the debtor’s trade name does not sufficiently provide the name of the debtor.

Representative capacity.Failure to indicate the representative capacity of a secured party or representative of a secured party does not affect the sufficiency of a financing statement.

Multiple debtors and secured parties.A financing statement may provide the name of more than one debtor and the name of more than one secured party.

Name of decedent.The name of the decedent indicated on the order appointing the personal representative of the decedent issued by the court having jurisdiction over the collateral is sufficient as the “name of the decedent” under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

Multiple driver’s licenses.If this state has issued to an individual more than one driver’s license of a kind described in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the one that was issued most recently is the one to which such paragraph refers.

Definition.As used in this Code section, the term “name of the settlor or testator” means:

If the settlor is a registered organization, the name that is stated to be the settlor’s name on the public organic record most recently filed with or issued or enacted by the settlor’s jurisdiction of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the settlor’s name; or

In other cases, the name of the settlor or testator indicated in the trust’s organic record.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-503, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 11/SB 185.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted the present provisions of paragraphs (a)(1) through (a)(3), for the former provisions, which read: “(1) If the debtor is a registered organization, only if the financing statement provides the name of the debtor indicated on the public record of the debtor’s jurisdiction of organization which shows the debtor to have been organized;

“(2) If the debtor is a decedent’s estate, only if the financing statement provides the name of the decedent and indicates that the debtor is an estate;

“(3) If the debtor is a trust or a trustee acting with respect to property held in trust, only if the financing statement:

“(A) Provides the name specified for the trust in its organic documents or, if no name is specified, provides the name of the settlor and additional information sufficient to distinguish the debtor from other trusts having one or more of the same settlors; and

“(B) Indicates, in the debtor’s name or otherwise, that the debtor is a trust or is a trustee acting with respect to property held in trust; and”; added present paragraphs (a)(4) and (a)(5); redesignated former paragraph (a)(4) as paragraph (a)(6); substituted “the financing statement provides the organizational” for “’it provides the individual or organizational” in subparagraph (a)(6)(A); added “, in a manner that each name provided would be sufficient if the person named were the debtor” at the end of subparagraph (a)(6)(B); substituted “subparagraph (a)(6)(B)” for “subparagraph (a)(4)(B)” in paragraph (b)(2); and added subsections (f) through (h).

11-9-504.
Indication of collateral.

A financing statement sufficiently indicates the collateral that it covers if the financing statement provides:

A description of the collateral pursuant to Code Section 11-9-108; or

An indication that the financing statement covers all assets or all personal property.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-504, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-505.
Filing and compliance with other statutes and treaties for consignments, leases, other bailments, and other transactions.

Use of terms other than “debtor” and “secured party.” A consignor, lessor, or other bailor of goods, a licensor, or a buyer of a payment intangible or promissory note may file a financing statement, or may comply with a statute or treaty described in subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-311, using the terms “consignor,” “consignee,” “lessor,” “lessee,” “bailor,” “bailee,” “licensor,” “licensee,” “owner,” “registered owner,” “buyer,” “seller,” or words of similar import, instead of the terms “secured party” and “debtor”.

Effect of financing statement under subsection (a) of this Code section.This part applies to the filing of a financing statement under subsection (a) of this Code section and, as appropriate, to compliance that is equivalent to filing a financing statement under subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-311, but the filing or compliance is not of itself a factor in determining whether the collateral secures an obligation. If it is determined for another reason that the collateral secures an obligation, a security interest held by the consignor, lessor, bailor, licensor, owner, or buyer which attaches to the collateral is perfected by the filing or compliance.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-505, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-506.
Effect of errors or omissions.

Minor errors and omissions.A financing statement substantially satisfying the requirements of this part is effective, even if it has minor errors or omissions, unless the errors or omissions make the financing statement seriously misleading.

Financing statement seriously misleading.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-503 is seriously misleading.

Financing statement not seriously misleading.If a search of the records of the filing office under the debtor’s correct name, using the filing office’s standard search logic, if any, would disclose a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-503, the name provided does not make the financing statement seriously misleading.

“Debtor’s correct name.” For purposes of subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-508, the “debtor’s correct name” as used in subsection (c) of this Code section means the correct name of the new debtor.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-506, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-507.
Effect of certain events on effectiveness of financing statement.

Disposition.A filed financing statement remains effective with respect to collateral that is sold, exchanged, leased, licensed, or otherwise disposed of and in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues, even if the secured party knows of or consents to the disposition.

Information becoming seriously misleading.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section and Code Section 11-9-508, a financing statement is not rendered ineffective if, after the financing statement is filed, the information provided in the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under Code Section 11-9-506.

Change in debtor’s name.If the name that a filed financing statement provides for a debtor becomes insufficient as the name of the debtor under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-503 so that the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under Code Section 11-9-506:

The financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor before, or within four months after, the filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading; and

The financing statement is not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor more than four months after the filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading, unless an amendment to the financing statement which renders the financing statement not seriously misleading is filed within four months after the financing statement became seriously misleading.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-507, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 12/SB 185.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (c), substituted “the name that a filed financing statement provides for a debtor becomes insufficient as the name of the debtor under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-503 so that the” for “a debtor so changes its name that a filed” at the beginning of the introductory language; substituted “filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading” for “change” in paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2); and substituted “financing statement became seriously misleading” for “change” at the end of paragraph (c)(2).

11-9-508.
Effectiveness of financing statement if new debtor becomes bound by security agreement.

Financing statement naming original debtor.Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, a filed financing statement naming an original debtor is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral in which a new debtor has or acquires rights to the extent that the financing statement would have been effective had the original debtor acquired rights in the collateral.

Financing statement becoming seriously misleading.If the difference between the name of the original debtor and that of the new debtor causes a filed financing statement that is effective under subsection (a) of this Code section to be seriously misleading under Code Section 11-9-506:

The financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor before, and within four months after, the new debtor becomes bound under subsection (d) of Code Section 11-9-203; and

The financing statement is not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor more than four months after the new debtor becomes bound under subsection (d) of Code Section 11-9-203 unless an initial financing statement providing the name of the new debtor is filed before the expiration of that time.

When Code section not applicable.This Code section does not apply to collateral as to which a filed financing statement remains effective against the new debtor under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-507.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-508, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-509.
Persons entitled to file a record.

Person entitled to file record.A person may file an initial financing statement, amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement, or amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if:

The debtor authorizes the filing in an authenticated record or pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section; or

The person holds an agricultural lien that has become effective at the time of filing and the financing statement covers only collateral in which the person holds an agricultural lien.

Security agreement as authorization.By authenticating or becoming bound as debtor by a security agreement, a debtor or new debtor authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering:

The collateral described in the security agreement; and

Property that becomes collateral under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-315, whether or not the security agreement expressly covers proceeds.

Acquisition of collateral as authorization.By acquiring collateral in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-315, a debtor authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering the collateral and property that becomes collateral under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-315.

Person entitled to file certain amendments.A person may file an amendment other than an amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement or an amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if:

The secured party of record authorizes the filing; or

The amendment is a termination statement for a financing statement as to which the secured party of record has failed to file or send a termination statement as required by subsection (a) or (c) of Code Section 11-9-513, the debtor authorizes the filing, and the termination statement indicates that the debtor authorized it to be filed.

Multiple secured parties of record.If there is more than one secured party of record for a financing statement, each secured party of record may authorize the filing of an amendment under subsection (d) of this Code section.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-509, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-510.
Effectiveness of filed record.

Filed record effective if authorized.A filed record is effective only to the extent that it was filed by a person that may file it under Code Section 11-9-509.

Authorization by one secured party of record.A record authorized by one secured party of record does not affect the financing statement with respect to another secured party of record.

Continuation statement not timely filed.A continuation statement that is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-515 is ineffective.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-510, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-511.
Secured party of record.

Secured party of record.A secured party of record with respect to a financing statement is a person whose name is provided as the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party in an initial financing statement that has been filed. If an initial financing statement is filed under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-514, the assignee named in the initial financing statement is the secured party of record with respect to the financing statement.

Amendment naming secured party of record.If an amendment of a financing statement which provides the name of a person as a secured party or a representative of a secured party is filed, the person named in the amendment is a secured party of record. If an amendment is filed under subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-514, the assignee named in the amendment is a secured party of record.

Amendment deleting secured party of record.A person remains a secured party of record until the filing of an amendment of the financing statement which deletes the person.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-511, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-512.
Amendment of financing statement.

Amendment of information in financing statement.Subject to Code Section 11-9-509, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or, subject to subsection (e) of this Code section, otherwise amend the information provided in a financing statement by filing an amendment that:

Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which the amendment relates; and

If the amendment relates to an initial financing statement filed or recorded in a filing office described in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-501, provides the information specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-502.

Period of effectiveness not affected.Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-515, the filing of an amendment does not extend the period of effectiveness of the financing statement.

Effectiveness of amendment adding collateral.A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds collateral is effective as to the added collateral only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

Effectiveness of amendment adding debtor.A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds a debtor is effective as to the added debtor only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

Certain amendments ineffective.An amendment is ineffective to the extent it:

Purports to delete all debtors and fails to provide the name of a debtor to be covered by the financing statement; or

Purports to delete all secured parties of record and fails to provide the name of a new secured party of record.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-512, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-513.
Termination statement.

Consumer goods.A secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to file a termination statement for the financing statement if the financing statement covers consumer goods and:

There is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value; or

The debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

Time for compliance with subsection (a) of this Code section.To comply with subsection (a) of this Code section, a secured party shall cause the secured party of record to file the termination statement:

Within one month after there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value; or

If earlier, within 20 days after the secured party receives an authenticated demand from a debtor.

Other collateral.In cases not governed by subsection (a) of this Code section, within 90 days after there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by or described in the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value or, if earlier, within 20 days after a secured party receives an authenticated demand from a debtor, the secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to send to the debtor a termination statement for the financing statement or file the termination statement in the filing office if:

Except in the case of a financing statement covering accounts or chattel paper that has been sold or goods that are the subject of a consignment, there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value;

The financing statement covers accounts or chattel paper that has been sold but as to which the account debtor or other person obligated has discharged its obligation;

The financing statement covers goods that were the subject of a consignment to the debtor but are not in the debtor’s possession; or

The debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

Effect of filing termination statement.Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-510, upon the filing of a termination statement with the filing office, the financing statement to which the termination statement relates ceases to be effective.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-513, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-514.
Assignment of powers of secured party of record.

Assignment reflected on initial financing statement.An initial financing statement may reflect an assignment of all of the secured party’s power to authorize an amendment to the financing statement by providing the name and mailing address of the assignee as the name and address of the secured party.

Assignment of filed financing statement.A secured party of record may assign of record all or part of its power to authorize an amendment to a financing statement by filing in the filing office an amendment of the financing statement which:

Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates;

Provides the name of the assignor; and

Provides the name and mailing address of the assignee.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-514, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-515.
Duration and effectiveness of financing statement; effect of lapsed financing statement; record of mortgage as financing statement.

Five-year effectiveness.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, a filed financing statement is effective for a period of five years after the date of filing or until the twentieth day after any earlier maturity date required to be specified on the filed financing statement.

Lapse and continuation of financing statement.The effectiveness of a filed financing statement lapses on the expiration of the period of its effectiveness unless before the lapse a continuation statement is filed pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section. Upon lapse, a financing statement ceases to be effective and any security interest or agricultural lien that was perfected by the financing statement becomes unperfected, unless the security interest is perfected otherwise. If the security interest or agricultural lien becomes unperfected upon lapse, it is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

When continuation statement may be filed.A continuation statement may be filed only within six months before the expiration of the five-year period specified in subsection (a) of this Code section or the occurrence of any earlier maturity date required to be specified on a filed financing statement.

Effect of filing continuation statement.Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-510, upon timely filing of a continuation statement, the effectiveness of the initial financing statement continues for a period of five years commencing on the day on which the financing statement would have become ineffective in the absence of the filing or, where both (1) the collateral described consists only of consumer goods as defined in paragraph (24) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-102 and (2) the secured obligation is originally $5,000.00 or less, any earlier maturity date of the secured obligation specified on such continuation statement. Upon the expiration of the five-year period or the earlier occurrence of a required specified maturity date, the financing statement lapses in the same manner as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, unless, before the lapse, another continuation statement is filed pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section. Succeeding continuation statements may be filed in the same manner to continue the effectiveness of the initial financing statement.

Record of mortgage as financing statement.A record of a mortgage that is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing under subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-502 remains effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing until the mortgage is released or satisfied of record or its effectiveness otherwise terminates as to the real property.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-515, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 13/SB 185.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added subsection (e).

11-9-516.
What constitutes filing; effectiveness of filing.

What constitutes filing.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, communication of a record to a filing office and tender of the filing fee or acceptance of the record by the filing office constitutes filing.

Refusal to accept record; filing does not occur.Filing does not occur with respect to a record that a filing office refuses to accept because:

The record is not communicated by a method or medium of communication authorized by the filing office;

An amount equal to or greater than the applicable filing fee is not tendered;

The authority is unable to index the record because:

In the case of an initial financing statement, the record does not provide a name for the debtor;

In the case of an amendment or information statement, the record:

Does not identify the initial financing statement as required by Code Section 11-9-512 or 11-9-518, as applicable;

Identifies an initial financing statement whose effectiveness has lapsed under Code Section 11-9-515;

Identifies more than one initial financing statement; or

Indicates that it is presented to accomplish more than one action, such as amendment and continuation;

In the case of an initial financing statement that provides the name of a debtor identified as an individual or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor identified as an individual which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates, the record does not identify the debtor’s surname; or

In the case of a record filed or recorded in the filing office described in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-501, the record does not provide a sufficient description of the real property to which it relates;

In the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that adds a secured party of record, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the secured party of record;

In the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the amendment relates, the record does not:

Provide a mailing address for the debtor; or

Indicate whether the name provided as the name of the debtor is the name of an individual or an organization; or

In the case of an assignment reflected in an initial financing statement under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-514 or an amendment filed under subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-514, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the assignee.

Rules applicable to subsection (b) of this Code section.For purposes of subsection (b) of this Code section:

A record does not provide information if the filing office is unable to read or decipher the information; and

A record that does not indicate that it is an amendment or accurately identify an initial financing statement to which it relates, as required by Code Section 11-9-512, 11-9-514, or 11-9-518, is an initial financing statement.

Refusal to accept record; record effective as filed record.A record that is communicated to the filing office with tender of the filing fee, but which the filing office refuses to accept for a reason other than one set forth in subsection (b) of this Code section, is effective as a filed record except as against a purchaser of the collateral which gives value in reasonable reliance upon the absence of the record from the files.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-516, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 14/SB 185.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “information statement” for “correction statement” in the introductory language of subparagraph (b)(3)(B); substituted “surname” for “last name” in subparagraph (b)(3)(C); and, in paragraph (b)(5), added “or” at the end of subparagraph (b)(5)(A), inserted “name provided as the name of the” and “the name of” in subparagraph (b)(5)(B), and deleted former paragraph (b)(5)(C), which read: “(C) If the financing statement indicates that the debtor is an organization, provide:

“(i) A type of organization for the debtor; or

“(ii) A jurisdiction of organization for the debtor; or”.

11-9-517.
Effect of indexing errors.

The failure of the filing office or authority to index a record correctly does not affect the effectiveness of the filed record.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-517, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-518.
Inaccurate or wrongfully filed record.

Statement with respect to record indexed under person’s name.A person may file in the filing office an information statement with respect to a record indexed under the person’s name if the person believes that the record is inaccurate or was wrongfully filed. The information statement shall be filed in the filing office of the county where the record was filed.

Contents of statement under subsection (a) of this Code section.An information statement under subsection (a) of this Code section must:

Identify the record to which it relates by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates;

Indicate that it is an information statement; and

Provide the basis for the person’s belief that the record is inaccurate and indicate the manner in which the person believes the record should be amended to cure any inaccuracy or provide the basis for the person’s belief that the record was wrongfully filed.

Statement by secured party of record.A person may file in the filing office an information statement with respect to a record filed there if such person is a secured party of record with respect to the financing statement to which the record relates and believes that the person that filed the record was not entitled to do so under subsection (d) of Code Section 11-9-509.

Contents of statement under subsection (c) of this Code section.An information statement under subsection (c) of this Code section must:

Identify the record to which it relates by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates;

Indicate that it is an information statement; and

Provide the basis for the person’s belief that the person that filed the record was not entitled to do so under subsection (d) of Code Section 11-9-509.

Record not affected by information statement.The filing of an information statement does not affect the effectiveness of an initial financing statement or other filed record.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-518, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 15/SB 185.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (a), substituted “Statement with respect to record indexed under person’s name” for “Correction statement” in the subsection heading, substituted “in the filing office an information” for “a correction” in the first sentence, and substituted “information” for “correction” in the second sentence; in subsection (b), substituted the present provisions of the introductory paragraph for the former provisions, which read: “Sufficiency of correction statement. A correction statement must:” and substituted “an information” for “a correction” in paragraph (b)(2); added present subsections (c) and (d); redesignated former subsection (c) as present subsection (e); and in subsection (e), substituted “information” for “correction” in the subsection heading and substituted “an information” for “a correction” near the beginning.